Hawaii statutes.
§622-56 Fees; service of more than one
subpoena. (a) All copies of medical records requested under this part
shall be paid for by the person, board, commission, or tribunal requesting such
records. The cost shall be based on the actual cost of preparation.

(b) This part shall not be deemed to require
the tender of more than one witness or mileage fee required, unless there is an
agreement to the contrary.

(c) If more than one subpoena duces tecum is
served upon the custodian or other qualified witness from a medical facility
and the personal attendance of that person is required, the witness shall be
deemed to be the witness of the party serving the first subpoena. [L 1971, c
139, pt of §1; am L 1972, c 104, §2(w); am L 1987, c 283, §61]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next